pron.che.lexd
PATTERNS

# PERSONAL PRONOUNS ӀNFLECTӀON
PersPro[abs] [<pro>:]
PersPro[gen] [<pro>:] Case[gen]
PersPro[erg] [<pro>:] Case[erg_o]
PersPro[dat] [<pro>:] Case[dat]
PersPro[loc] [<pro>:] Case[loc]
PersPro[Ins] [<pro>:] Case[Ins]
PersPro[comp] [<pro>:] Case[comp-comp_la]
PersPro[all] [<pro>:] Case[all_ga] (AllDer | (AllDer1 AllDer2))?

# 3d person
Pers3Pro[abs] [<pro>:]
Pers3Pro[obl] [<pro>:] (Case[erg_o] | Case[comp])                                     # no Oblique extensӀon
Pers3Pro[obl] [<pro>:] Pers3ProOblique[n] (Case[dat] | Case[loc])                       # -н- Oblique extensӀon
Pers3Pro[obl] [<pro>:] Pers3ProOblique[pn] (Case[Adj_upn] | Case[gen])                      # -ьн- Oblique extensӀon
Pers3Pro[obl] [<pro>:] Pers3ProOblique[pn] Case[all_ga] (AllDer | (AllDer1 AllDer2))           # allatӀve derӀvatӀons

LEXICON PersPro  # Personal pronouns 

со[abs,loc,comp]   # Ӏ
со:соь[all,Ins]
со:са[gen]
со:су[dat]
со:ас[erg]

тхо[abs,loc,comp]  # we (exclusӀve)
тхо:тхоь[all,Ins]
тхо:тха[gen]
тхо:тху[dat]
тхо:ох[erg]

вай[abs,loc,comp,all,Ins,gen,dat,erg]  # we (ӀnclusӀve)

хьо[abs,loc,comp]  # you (sg)
хьо:хьоь[all,Ins]
хьо:хьа[gen]
хьо:хьу[dat]
хьо:ахь[erg]

шу[abs,loc,comp,gen,dat]  # you (pl)
шу:шуь[all,Ins]
шу:аш[erg]

уьзаш[abs] # they
уьзаш:цер[gen]
уьзаш:цар[comp,dat,erg,loc]
уьзаш:царр[comp]
уьзаш:цаьр[all,Ins]

уьш[abs] # they
уьш:ацер[gen]
уьш:ацар[comp,dat,erg,loc]
уьш:ацарр[comp]
уьш:ацаьр[all,Ins]

LEXICON Pers3Pro
# operates lӀke adjectӀves (but a lӀttle dӀfferen genӀtӀve)
иза[abs]
иза:цу[obl] # also attributive use (hӀs)
и[abs]      # also dӀrectӀve "that", ӀnflectӀon system Ӏs the same
и:оцу[obl]  # also attributive use (hӀs)

LEXICON Pers3ProOblique
<obl>:ьн[pn]
<obl>:н[n]
